District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

35-404

Commission authorized to make rules and regulations.

Repealed.

History

June 29, 1938, ch. 809, § 4
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 953, Pub. L. 85-792,§ 2
Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 22(a), 33 DCR 703

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 44-304.
1973 Ed., § 44-304.